Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Commission on Race and

Equality. The Commission shall be appointed as follows:

1. Three members shall be appointed by the Governor;

2. Three members shall be appointed by the President Pro

Tempore of the Senate;

3. Three members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House

of Representatives; and

4. Four members shall be appointed by the Oklahoma Legislative

Black Caucus.

Req. No. 2686 Page 1

B. 1. The members appointed by the Governor shall serve an

initial term of one (1) year, and subsequently a term of three (3)

years, commencing upon the date that the previous appointee’s term

expired.

2. The members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the

Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve

an initial term of two (2) years, and subsequently a term of three

(3) years, commencing upon the date that the previous appointee’s

term expired.

3. The members appointed by the Oklahoma Legislative Black

Caucus shall serve for a term of three (3) years commencing upon the

date that the previous appointee’s term expired.

4. Each member shall serve no more than three terms. Each

member shall only serve two consecutive terms and shall be inactive

for a period of one (1) year prior to serving the maximum three-term

limit.

C. In making such appointments, consideration shall be given to

making the membership broadly representative of the geographic areas

of this state and the racial and ethnic groups residing in this

state.

D. Each member shall hold office until the successor of the

member is appointed and has qualified. A member appointed to fill a

vacancy occurring before the expiration of a term of a member who

resigned or is removed from the Commission for cause shall be

Req. No. 2686 Page 2

appo inted for the remainder of the term of the member whose office

has been vacated.

E. A member of the Commission may be removed by the appropriate

appointing authority for cause.

F. Members of the Commission shall receive no salary but shall

be entitled to travel reimbursement as provided by the State Travel

Reimbursement Act from funds available to the appropriate appointing

authority.

G. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall

provide staff support to the Oklahoma Commission on Race and

Equality and make arrangements for a suitable meeting space for the

Commission as needed.

H. The initial chair shall be appointed by the Oklahoma

Legislative Black Caucus, with the approval of the Governor,

President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and Speaker of the House of

Representatives. After the initial chair’s first term ends, the

President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall name the chair of the

Oklahoma Commission on Race and Equality, and the Speaker of the

House of Representatives shall name the vice chair. Any other

officers deemed necessary shall be elected from among the members at

the first meeting of the Commission. Thereafter, at the first

meeting of each fiscal year, the Commission shall elect a chair, a

vice chair, and such other officers deemed necessary to conduct the

business of the Commission from among its members. A majority of

Req. No. 2686 Page 3

the members present shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of

conducting the business of the Commission. The Commission shall

meet at least once every three (3) months and at such other times as

called by the chair or by a majority of the Commission.

I. The Oklahoma Commission on Race and Equality shall have the

power and duty to:

1. Advise on equality issues relating to racial discrimination

and bias, state agencies and employees, communities, organizations,

and businesses of this state which desire the service of the

Commission;

2. Monitor legislation to determine whether legislation is

discriminatory toward one race or ethnicity or whether the race or

ethnicity of an individual would have an effect on the enforcement

of the legislation;

3. Act as a resource and a clearinghouse for research on issues

related to racial discrimination and bias;

4. Act as a resource in any state appointments to commissions

and boards for diversity;

5. Conduct meetings and seminars within the state as

appropriate to support the goals and duties of the Commission; and

6. Electronically submit an annual report to the Governor, the

President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of

Representatives on its activities. The report may include



Req. No. 2686 Page 4

reco mmendations concerning needed legislation or regulatory change

relating to racial discrimination and bias.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13002 of Title 74, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund

for the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to be

designated the “Oklahoma Commission on Race and Equality Revolving

Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal

year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the

Office of Management and Enterprise Services from all gifts and

donations provided for the purpose of supporting the work of the

Oklahoma Commission on Race and Equality. All monies accruing to

the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted

and expended by the Director of the Office of Management and

Enterprise Services on behalf of the Oklahoma Commission on Race and

Equality for the purpose provided for in this section. Expenditures

from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State

Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the

Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for

approval and payment.

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.



60-2-2686 MSBB 12/17/2025 2:47:17 PM

Req. No. 2686 Page 5